Maryland, session 2025, HB0434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–807.
(a) In this section, “SLAPP suit” means a strategic lawsuit against public
participation.
(b) [A] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A lawsuit is a SLAPP
suit if it is[:
(1) Brought in bad faith against a party who has communicated with a
federal, State, or local government body or the public at large to report on, comment on,
rule on, challenge, oppose, or in any other way exercise rights under the First Amendment
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0434*

HOUSE BILL 434
of the U.S. Constitution or Article 10, Article 13, or Article 40 of the Maryland Declaration
of Rights regarding any matter within the authority of a government body or any issue of
public concern;
(2) Materially related to the defendant’s communication; and
(3) Intended to inhibit or inhibits the exercise of rights under the First
Amendment of the U.S. Constitution or Article 10, Article 13, or Article 40 of the Maryland
Declaration of Rights] BROUGHT AGAINST A PERSON BASED ON AN ACT OR A
STATEMENT OF THE PERSON THAT WAS DONE OR MADE IN FURTHERANCE OF THE
PERSON’S RIGHT OF PETITION OR FREE SPEECH UNDER THE U.S. CONSTITUTION,
THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION, OR THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS IN
CONNECTION WITH A PUBLIC ISSUE OR AN ISSUE OF PUBLIC INTEREST, INCLUDING
A WRITTEN OR AN ORAL STATEMENT MADE:
(1) BEFORE A LEGISLATIVE, EXECUTIVE, OR JUDICIAL PROCEEDING
OR ANY OTHER OFFICIAL PROCEEDING AUTHORIZED BY LAW;
(2) IN CONNECTION WITH AN ISSUE UNDER CONSIDERATION OR
REVIEW BY A LEGISLATIVE, EXECUTIVE, OR JUDICIAL BODY OR ANY OTHER OFFICIAL
PROCEEDING AUTHORIZED BY LAW;
(3) IN A PLACE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC OR A PUBLIC FORUM IN
CONNECTION WITH AN ISSUE OF PUBLIC INTEREST; OR
(4) TO A GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR AN INDIVIDUAL RUNNING FOR
PUBLIC OFFICE.
(C) A LAWSUIT IS NOT A SLAPP SUIT IF:
(1) THE LAWSUIT IS BROUGHT IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST OR ON
BEHALF OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC AND EACH OF THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS
EXISTS:
(I) EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS FOR ATTORNEY’S FEES, COSTS, OR
PENALTIES, THE PLAINTIFF DOES NOT SEEK ANY RELIEF GREATER THAN OR
DIFFERENT FROM THE RELIEF SOUGHT FOR THE GENERAL PUBLIC OR A CLASS OF
WHICH THE PLAINTIFF IS A MEMBER;
(II) THE LAWSUIT, IF SUCCESSFUL, WOULD ENFORCE AN
IMPORTANT RIGHT AFFECTING THE PUBLIC INTEREST AND WOULD CONFER A
SIGNIFICANT BENEFIT, PECUNIARY OR NONPECUNIARY, TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC
OR A LARGE CLASS OF PERSONS; AND
(III) PRIVATE ENFORCEMENT IS NECESSARY AND PLACES A

HOUSE BILL 434 3
DISPROPORTIONATE FINANCIAL BURDEN ON THE PLAINTIFF IN RELATION TO THE
PLAINTIFF’S STAKE IN THE MATTER; OR
(2) THE LAWSUIT INVOLVES A DEFENDANT WHO:
(I) PRIMARILY ENGAGES IN THE BUSINESS OF SELLING OR
LEASING GOODS OR SERVICES, INCLUDING INSURANCE, SECURITIES, OR FINANCIAL
INSTRUMENTS; AND
(II) 1. MADE A STATEMENT OR ENGAGED IN CONDUCT THAT
CONSISTED OF REPRESENTATIONS OF FACT ABOUT THE DEFENDANT’S OR A
BUSINESS COMPETITOR’S BUSINESS OPERATIONS, GOODS, OR SERVICES FOR THE
PURPOSE OF OBTAINING APPROVAL FOR, PROMOTING, OR SECURING SALES OR
LEASES OF OR COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS IN THE DEFENDANT’S GOODS OR
SERVICES; OR
2. IN THE COURSE OF DELIVERING THE DEFENDANT’S
GOODS OR SERVICES, IS ALLEGED TO HAVE MADE A STATEMENT OR ENGAGED IN
CONDUCT THAT DISPARAGES A BUSINESS COMPETITOR’S BUSINESS OPERATIONS,
GOODS, OR SERVICES.
[(c)] (D) A defendant in a SLAPP suit is not civilly liable for communicating with
a federal, State, or local government body or the public at large, if the defendant, without
constitutional malice, [reports on, comments on, rules on, challenges, opposes, or in any
other way exercises rights under the First Amendment of the U.S. Constitution or Article
10, Article 13, or Article 40 of the Maryland Declaration of Rights] ACTED IN
FURTHERANCE OF THE DEFENDANT’S RIGHT OF PETITION OR FREE SPEECH UNDER
THE U.S. CONSTITUTION, THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION, OR THE MARYLAND
DECLARATION OF RIGHTS regarding any matter within the authority of a government
body or any PUBLIC issue OR ISSUE of public [concern] INTEREST.
[(d)] (E) (1) A defendant in an alleged SLAPP suit may move to:
[(1)] (I) Dismiss the alleged SLAPP suit, in which case the court shall
hold a hearing on the motion to dismiss as soon as practicable AND RULE EXPEDITIOUSLY;
or
[(2)] (II) Stay all court proceedings until the matter about which the
defendant communicated to the government body or the public at large is resolved.
(2) IT IS THE PLAINTIFF’S BURDEN IN RESPONDING TO A MOTION TO
DISMISS TO SHOW THAT THE ALLEGED SLAPP SUIT HAS SUBSTANTIAL
JUSTIFICATION IN LAW AND FACT.

HOUSE BILL 434
(3) (I) IF IT APPEARS LIKELY THAT DISCOVERY WILL ENABLE THE
PLAINTIFF TO DEFEAT A MOTION TO DISMISS AND THAT THE DISCOVERY WILL NOT
BE UNDULY BURDENSOME, THE COURT MAY ORDER THAT SPECIFIED DISCOVERY BE
CONDUCTED.
(II) AN ORDER UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
CONDITIONED ON THE PLAINTIFF PAYING ANY EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE
DEFENDANT IN RESPONDING TO THE DISCOVERY.
(4) (I) IF THE COURT GRANTS AN ANTI–SLAPP MOTION, THE
COURT SHALL AWARD COSTS AND REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES TO THE MOVING
PARTY IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT JUSTICE AND EQUITY REQUIRE IT.
(II) IF THE COURT FINDS THAT A MOTION TO DISMISS IS
FRIVOLOUS OR SOLELY INTENDED TO CAUSE UNNECESSARY DELAY, THE COURT MAY
AWARD COSTS AND REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES TO THE RESPONDING PARTY.
[(e)] (F) This section:
(1) Is applicable to SLAPP suits notwithstanding any other law or rule; and
(2) Does not diminish any equitable or legal right or remedy otherwise
available to a defendant in a SLAPP suit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any cause of action arising before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.